District of Columbia statutes.
10-1221.07

Issuance of the bonds.

(a)

The bonds shall be issued as a TIF note to the Authority and may be held and used as security for bonds to be issued by the Authority.

(b)

The bonds shall not be issued until the Mayor receives an approving opinion from Bond Counsel as to the validity of the bonds and, if the interest on the bonds is expected to be exempt from federal income taxation, the treatment of the interest on the bonds for purposes of federal income taxation.

Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 107, 53 DCR 5430
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 107 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).